Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.031, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Student bullying policy; scope and application. (a) This section applies to bullying by a student against another student enrolled in a public school and which occurs: (1) on the school premises, at the school functions or activities, or on the school transportation; (2) by use of electronic technology and communications on the school premises, during the school functions or activities, on the school transportation, or on the school computers, networks, forums, and mailing lists; or (3) by use of electronic technology and communicationsnew text begin on a school-issued device, as defined in section 13.32, subdivision 1,new text end off the school premises to the extent such use substantially and materially disrupts student learning or the school environment. (b) A nonpublic school under section 123B.41, subdivision 9, consistent with its school accreditation cycle, is encouraged to electronically transmit to the commissioner its antibullying policy, if any, and any summary data on its bullying incidents. (c) This section does not apply to a home school under sections 120A.22, subdivision 4, and 120A.24, or a nonpublic school under section 123B.41, subdivision 9. (d) A school-aged child who voluntarily participates in a public school activity, such as a cocurricular or extracurricular activity, is subject to the same student bullying policy provisions applicable to the public school students participating in the activity.